Washington statutes.
RCW 2.64.115

Application of open public meetings act—Exemptions.

The commission is subject to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. However, investigations, initial proceedings, public hearings, and executive sessions involving the discipline or retirement of a judge or justice are governed by this chapter and Article IV, section 31 of the state Constitution and are exempt from the provisions of chapter 42.30 RCW.

[ 1989 c 367 s 8.]

NOTES:

Contingent effective date—1989 c 367: See note following RCW 2.64.010.